Utah statutes.
58-37d-6.   Legal inference of intent -- Illegal possession of a controlled
substance precursor or clandestine laboratory equipment.
The trier of fact may infer that the defendant intended to engage in a
clandestine laboratory operation if the defendant:
(1)  is in illegal possession of a controlled substance precursor; or
(2)  illegally possesses or attempts to illegally possess a controlled
substance precursor and is in possession of any one of the following pieces of
equipment:
(a)  glass reaction vessel;
(b)  separatory funnel;
(c)  glass condenser;
(d)  analytical balance; or
(e)  heating mantle.
